North Carolina, session 2025, SB487.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143C-1-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-1-2. Appropriations: constitutional requirement; reversions.
…
(a1) Legislative Sponsor Requirement. – An appropriation enacted in the Current
Operations Appropriations Act shall not be legally valid unless (i) the appropriation is sponsored
by a member of the General Assembly and (ii) the name of the sponsoring legislator is stated in
the text of the appropriation.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S487-v-1*